Massachusetts, session 194th, H1018.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 21G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the definition of “Permit” the
following sentence:-
The permit program is intended to assist the department in the comprehensive
management of the commonwealth’s water resources within its river basins in a manner that
ensures an appropriate balance among competing water withdrawals and uses, as well as
preservation of the water resource itself.
of 2

SECTION 2. Said section 2 of said chapter 21G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting at the end of the definition of “Registration statement” the
following sentence:-
The registration statement is intended to enable the department to document baseline
water use in the commonwealth.
SECTION 3. Section 5 of said chapter 21G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
All properly filed water management act renewal registration statements shall entitle the
registrants to their registered water use volumes without conditions excepting that the department
may require proper metering or other means to accurately measure the volume of water
withdrawn under a renewal registration statement. No regulations may be promulgated that
would allow the imposition of any such conditions other than withdrawal volume measurement.
of 2